Louisiana, session 2026, HB798.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 12-B of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:1381 through 1389, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 12-B. THE BROADBAND AND CABLE PRICE NOTICE ACT
§1381. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Broadband and Cable
Price Notice Act."
§1382. Definitions
(1) "Broadband internet access service" means a mass-market retail service
that provides the capability to transmit data to and receive data from substantially all
internet endpoints, including any functional equivalents.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-197 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 798
(2) "Cable or video service" means the one-way transmission to subscribers
of video programming or other programming service by a cable operator or video
service provider, including services provided pursuant to a state or local franchise.
(3) "Customer" means a person who receives cable or video service or
broadband internet access service at a address in this state.
(4) "Price increase" means any increase to a customer's monthly recurring
charge or mandatory fee for service, including but not limited to base service
charges, equipment rental fees, modem or router fees, "broadcast TV" or "regional
sports" network access, or similar surcharges. "Price increase" does not include
taxes or fees imposed by federal, state, or local government.
(5) "Provider" means any person or entity that offers cable or video service
or broadband internet access service to customers in this state, whether pursuant to
a local franchise, a state-issued certificate, or otherwise.
(6) "Written notice" includes delivery by United States mail, email, or text
message, if the customer has elected to receive billing or account communications
through that channel.
§1383. Advance notice required; timing
A. A provider shall furnish clear and conspicuous written notice to each
affected customer at least thirty calendar days before the effective date of any price
increase.
B. When a price increase results from circumstances outside the provider's
reasonable control including but not limited to programmer pass-through charges
imposed with less than thirty days' notice to the provider, the provider shall give
written notice as soon as practicable, but in no event later than the customer's next
regular billing cycle after the provider learns of the change.
C. A customer may cancel or downgrade the affected service without early
termination fees or other penalties triggered solely by the price increase, if the
customer gives notice of cancellation on or before the effective date or within thirty
days after receiving a written notice pursuant to this Section.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-197 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 798
D. Any broadband or cable service provider that complies with applicable
federal disclosure requirements, including the Federal Communications
Commission's broadband consumer label requirements, shall be deemed in
compliance with the disclosure requirements of this Chapter, if such disclosures are
made available to consumers in this state.
E. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to shorten or limit any federal
notice requirement that provides greater advance notice for cable service.
§1384. Content of notice
A. The written notice described in this Chapter shall include all of the
following:
(1) The customer's current monthly recurring charges and each new charge
and fee, itemized by line item.
(2) The effective date of the increase.
(3) A brief statement of the reason for the increase.
(4) A statement of the customer's right to cancel or downgrade the affected
service without early termination fees or other penalties triggered solely by the price
increase, provided the customer gives notice of cancellation on or before the
effective date or within thirty days after receiving a written notice in accordance with
R.S. 51:1383.
(5) A toll-free telephone number and web address where a customer may
obtain additional information or exercise cancellation and downgrade rights.
B. The written notice outlined in this Chapter shall be sent to a customer
separately from any bill from the provider.
§1385. Method of delivery; recordkeeping
A. Written notice may be provided by any channel the customer has selected
for billing or account communications; if no election exists, written notice shall be
sent by United States mail to the service address or billing address on file.
B. A provider shall retain records sufficient to demonstrate compliance with
this Chapter, including samples of notices and logs of the dates and channels used,
for two years from the effective date of each price increase.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-197 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 798
§1386. Customer rights preserved
A. A provider shall not treat a customer's exercise of rights pursuant to R.S.
51:1383 as a breach of contract or impose any fee or penalty triggered solely by the
customer's cancellation or downgrade in response to a price increase.
B. Nothing in this Chapter prohibits a provider from recovering unreturned
equipment charges or other amounts lawfully owed that are not early termination
fees.
§1387. Enforcement; unfair trade practice; remedies
A. A violation of this Chapter is an unfair or deceptive trade practice in
accordance with the Louisiana Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law,
R.S. 51:1401 et seq.
B. The attorney general may investigate and bring actions to enforce this
Chapter including civil penalties, injunctive relief, restitution, and attorneys' fees as
authorized by Louisiana Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S.
51:1401 et seq.
C. The remedies provided by this Chapter are in addition to any other
remedies available at law or in equity, including private actions authorized by
Louisiana Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401 et
seq.
§1388. Construction; federal and local law
A. This Chapter is a disclosure and customer-notice requirement only and
shall not be construed as rate regulation or to require any specific price, term, or
offering.
B. For cable or video services, this Chapter shall be construed in harmony
with federal law, including 47 U.S.C. 521 et seq. and 47 CFR 76.1603, and shall not
diminish any federal or franchise-authority notice obligations that are equal to or
greater than.
C. Nothing in this Chapter shall limit the authority of a local franchise
authority to adopt or enforce customer-service standards or notice provisions, if a
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-197 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 798
provider that complies with the more stringent applicable requirement is deemed in
compliance with this Chapter.
§1389. Rulemaking
The attorney general may promulgate rules under the Administrative
Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Chapter, including rules
specifying reasonable notice formats and record keeping standards.
Section 2. This Act applies to price increases first noticed to customers on or after
the effective date of this Act. It does not require re-noticing of increases that took effect
before the effective date of this Act.
Section 3. All disclosures required pursuant to this Act shall be limited to factual,
objective, and noncontroversial commercial information reasonably related to the state's
interest in preventing consumer deception and promoting transparency.
Section 4. This Act shall apply only to consumer protection and disclosure practices
affecting customers within this state and shall not be construed to regulate interstate
communications services in a manner inconsistent with federal law.
Section 5. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 6. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.